Utah statutes.
59-18-107.   Amendment of governing instrument.

(1)  In the case of a trust which is solely for a named charitable organization or organizations and as to which the trustee does not possess any discretion with regard to the distribution of income or principal among two or more such organizations, the trustee, with the consent of the named charitable organization or organizations, may amend the governing instrument to comply with the provisions of Subsection 59-18-105(2).

(2)  In the case of a charitable trust which is not subject to the provisions of Subsection (1), the trustee with the consent of the attorney general may amend the governing instrument to comply with the provisions of Subsection 59-18-105(2).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 1987 General Session

